South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S719.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 13, Title 17 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 17-13-55.   (A) A law enforcement officer authorized, with reasonable suspicion, to detain a person found violating or attempting to violate any of the laws of the State and who detains a person, whether or not an arrest is subsequently made of such person, must activate audio and video recording equipment upon detaining a person and inform the detained person of the following: (1) that the person is being detained; (2) the reason why the person is being detained; and (3) when the person being detained is free to leave. (B) Prior to arrest, statements obtained by a law enforcement officer who fails to provide a person detained with the required information provided in subsection (A) are inadmissible in a court of law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----